Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6554
Application; valid; when; director; Tax Commissioner; powers and duties.

(1) Any complete application shall be considered a valid application on the date submitted for the purposes of the Grow the Good Life Act.

(2) The director shall be allowed access, by the Tax Commissioner, to information associated with the Employment and Investment Growth Act, the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, the Key Employer and Jobs Retention Act, the Nebraska Advantage Act, and the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act to meet the director's obligations under the Grow the Good Life Act.

(3) The director may contract with the Tax Commissioner for services that the director determines are necessary to fulfill the director's responsibilities under the Grow the Good Life Act, other than services which constitute the actual actions and decisions required to be taken or made by the director under the Grow the Good Life Act.

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 11.
April 17, 2026
Employment and Investment Growth Act, see section 77-4101.

ImagiNE Nebraska Act, see section 77-6801.

Key Employer and Jobs Retention Act, see section 77-6501.

Nebraska Advantage Act, see section 77-5701.

Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, see section 77-27,187.